District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Job Growth Incentive Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-1807.51(2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) "Credit period” means a period of up to 60 consecutive months for which a taxpayer
may claim the job growth tax credit that is calculated annually by the Mayor. The credit period
shall not extend past December 31, 2020, for credits claimed between January 1, 2010, and
January 1, 2015, and shall not extend past December 31, 2037, for credits claimed between
January 1, 2027, and January 1, 2032.”.
(b) Section 47-1807.52 is amended by striking the phrase “For tax years beginning on or


after January 1, 2010, but prior to January 1, 2015” and inserting the phrase “For tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2010, but prior to January 1, 2015, and for tax years beginning
on or after January 1, 2027, but prior to January 1, 2032” in its place.
(c) Section 47-1807.53(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1)(A) For job growth tax credits claimed by taxpayers between January 1, 2010, and
January 1, 2015, bring a net job growth of at least 10 new jobs to the District of Columbia with
an average yearly wage of at least 120% of the average yearly wage of residents of the District of
Columbia;
“(B) For job growth tax credits claimed by taxpayers between January 1, 2027,
and January 1, 2032, bring a net job growth of at least 25 new jobs to the District of Columbia
with an average yearly wage of at least 100% of the average yearly wage of residents of the
District of Columbia;”.
(c) Section 47-1807.54(b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b)(1) For job growth tax credits claimed by taxpayers between January 1, 2010, and
January 1, 2015, the job growth tax credit allowed shall be calculated by the Mayor as follows:
“(A) For the maximum amount of the job growth tax credit available to
the taxpayer for the credit period, the Mayor shall multiply the estimated net job growth for each
of the years in the credit period by 50% of the taxpayer's total estimated FICA taxes each year
for all new employees of the project who are residents of the District of Columbia.
“(B) For the annual amount of the job growth tax credit allowed, the
Mayor shall multiply the actual net job growth for that year by 50% of the taxpayer's FICA taxes
for the new employees of the project who are residents of the District of Columbia; provided,
that a job growth tax credit shall not be allowed, and a credit certificate shall be not be issued, in


an amount that exceeds the maximum amount of the approved job growth tax credits as
calculated pursuant to sub-paragraph (A) of this subsection.
“(C) If the amount of the credit allowed under paragraph (2) of this
subsection exceeds the amount of franchise taxes otherwise due on the taxpayer's income in the
tax year for which the job growth tax credit is being claimed, the unused amount of the job
growth tax credit may be carried forward and used as a credit against subsequent years' franchise
tax liability for a period not to exceed 10 years and shall be applied first to the earliest tax years
possible. Any credit remaining after this period shall not be refunded or credited to the taxpayer.
“(D) A taxpayer who uses a job growth tax credit that is subsequently
disallowed shall be liable for the resulting tax deficiency, interest, and penalties as otherwise
provided by law.
“(2) For job growth tax credits claimed by taxpayers between January 1, 2027,
and January 1, 2032, the job growth tax credit allowed shall be calculated by the Mayor as
follows:
“(A) For the maximum amount of the job growth tax credit available to
the taxpayer for the credit period, the Mayor shall multiply the estimated net job growth for each
of the years in the credit period by 100% of the taxpayer's total estimated FICA taxes each year
for all new employees of the project who are residents of the District of Columbia.
“(B) For the annual amount of the job growth tax credit allowed, the
Mayor shall multiply the actual net job growth for that year by 100% of the taxpayer's FICA
taxes for the new employees of the project who are residents of the District of Columbia;
provided, that a job growth tax credit shall not be allowed, and a credit certificate shall be not be
issued, in an amount that exceeds the maximum amount of the approved job growth tax credits


as calculated pursuant to sub-paragraph (A) of this subsection.
“(C) If the amount of the credit allowed under paragraph (2) of this
subsection exceeds the amount of franchise taxes otherwise due on the taxpayer's income in the
tax year for which the job growth tax credit is being claimed, the unused amount of the job
growth tax credit may be carried forward and used as a credit against subsequent years' franchise
tax liability for a period not to exceed 10 years and shall be applied first to the earliest tax years
possible. Any credit remaining after this period shall not be refunded or credited to the taxpayer.
“(D) A taxpayer who uses a job growth tax credit that is subsequently
disallowed shall be liable for the resulting tax deficiency, interest, and penalties as otherwise
provided by law.”.
Sec. 3. Section 3 of the Job Growth Incentive Act of 2025, effective July 27, 2010 (D.C.
Law 18-202; D.C. Official Code § 47-1807.09), is amended by s triking the phrase “January 1,
2030” and inserting the phrase “January 1, 2043” it its place.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ l-206.02(c)(l)).